Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 2 Regulation of Fire and Other
Hazards to Persons and
Property Generally

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization, practice and procedures of the Safety Fire Commissioner, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Comptroller General, Safety Fire Commissioner, Chapter 120-3-2 et seq.

25-2-1.
“Commissioner” defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “Commissioner” means the Safety Fire Commissioner.

25-2-2.
Safety Fire Commissioner — Office created.

The office of Safety Fire Commissioner is created. The Commissioner of Insurance shall be the Safety Fire Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 1; Ga. L. 1950, p. 320, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 9.

25-2-3.
Safety Fire Commissioner — Duties and responsibilities generally; delegation of powers.

Except as provided in Code Section 25-2-12, the Commissioner is charged with the duties and chief responsibility for the enforcement of this chapter. He may, consistent with this chapter, delegate to the officers and employees appointed under this chapter such duties and powers as in his discretion he shall deem necessary or advisable for the proper enforcement of this chapter and shall have full supervision and control over such officers and employees in the performance of their duties or in the exercise of any powers granted to such officers and employees by him or by this chapter. Except as provided in Code Section 25-2-12, the Commissioner shall be the final authority in all matters relating to the interpretation and enforcement of this chapter, except insofar as his orders may be reversed or modified by the courts.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1779, § 1.

Cross references.

Manufactured homes generally, §

8-2-130

et seq.

25-2-4.
Safety Fire Commissioner — Adoption of rules and regulations.

The Commissioner shall adopt such rules and regulations as he deems necessary to promote the enforcement of this chapter. Such rules and regulations shall have the force and effect of law and shall have state-wide application as being the state minimum fire safety standards and shall not require adoption by a municipality or county. The governing authority of any municipality or county in this state is authorized to enforce the state minimum fire safety standards on all buildings and structures except one-family and two-family dwellings and those buildings and structures listed in Code Section 25-2-13.
All other applications of the state minimum fire safety standards and fees are specified in Code Sections 25-2-4.1, 25-2-12, and 25-2-12.1.
Before the Commissioner shall adopt as a part of his rules and regulations for the enforcement of this chapter any of the principles of the various codes referred to in this chapter, he shall first consider and approve them as reasonably suitable for the enforcement of this chapter. Not less than 15 days before any rules and regulations are promulgated, a public hearing shall be held. Notice of the hearing shall be advertised in a newspaper of general circulation.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2186, § 1.

Cross references.

Complying with filing and hearing requirements by Safety Fire Commissioner and Commissioner of Insurance, §

50-13-21

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of Practice and Procedure, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Comptroller General, Chapter 120-3-2.

Rules and Regulations for the State Minimum Fire Safety Standards, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Comptroller General, Chapter 130-3-3.

25-2-4.1.
Safety Fire Commissioner — Fees and charges.

The Commissioner is authorized to assess and collect, and persons so assessed shall pay in advance to the Commissioner, fees and charges under this chapter as follows:

New anhydrous ammonia permit for storage in bulk (more than 2,000 gallons aggregate capacity) for sale or distribution one-time fee $ 150.00 (2) Annual license for manufacture of explosives other than fireworks 150.00 (3) Annual license for manufacture, storage, or transport of fireworks 1,500.00 (4) Carnival license 150.00 (5) Certificate of occupancy 100.00 (6) Construction plan review: 150.00 (A) Bulk storage construction 150.00 (B) Building construction, 10,000 square feet or less 150.00 (C) Building construction, more than 10,000 square feet .015 per square foot (D) Other construction 150.00 (7) Fire sprinkler contractor certificate of competency 150.00 (8) Liquefied petroleum gas storage license: (A) 2,000 gallons or less 150.00 (B) More than 2,000 gallons 600.00 (9) Building construction inspection: (A) 80 percent completion, 100 percent completion, annual, and first follow-up none (B) Second follow-up 150.00 (C) Third and each subsequent follow-up . 220.00 (10) Purchase, storage, sale, transport, or use of explosives other than fireworks: (A) 500 pounds or less 75.00 (B) More than 500 pounds 150.00 (11) New self-service gasoline station permit one-time fee 150.00 (12) New permit to dispense compressed natural gas (CNG) for vehicular fuel one-time fee 150.00

Click to view

The licenses and permits for which fees or charges are required pursuant to this Code section shall not be transferable. A new license or permit and fee are required upon change of ownership.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-2-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2725, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 448, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-50/HB 1055.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, a hyphen was inserted between “one” and “time” in paragraph (11).

25-2-5.
State fire marshal — Appointment; qualifications; salary.

The Commissioner shall appoint a state fire marshal. Qualifications for appointment as state fire marshal shall be previous training and experience in endeavors similar to those prescribed in this chapter. The Commissioner shall fix the salary of the state fire marshal.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 4.

25-2-6.
State fire marshal; head of Safety Fire Division.

The Safety Fire Division of the office of the Commissioner of Insurance shall be headed by the state fire marshal appointed by the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 10; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 25/HB 90.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “office of the Commissioner” for “office of Commissioner” in this Code section.

25-2-7.
Appointment process of deputy state fire marshal and other personnel.

The state fire marshal, subject to the approval of the Commissioner, shall appoint a deputy state fire marshal and administrative fire safety specialists and shall employ such office personnel as may be required to carry out this chapter. The deputy state fire marshal and administrative fire safety specialists shall be chosen by virtue of their previous training and experience in the particular duties which shall be assigned to them. They shall take an oath to perform faithfully the duties of their office.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 5; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1779, § 2.

25-2-8.
Payment of transportation, etc., expenses of employees in state fire marshal’s office.

All state employees connected with the state fire marshal’s office shall be allowed subsistence, lodging, and other expenses in connection with the execution of their duties when away from their headquarters. Transportation for such employees shall be paid at the mileage rate fixed by law for other state employees.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 27.

Cross references.

Mileage, actual travel expenses for state officials and employees, and reimbursement, §

50-19-7

.

25-2-9.
Authority of fire marshal and employees to investigate cause and origin of fires; power to arrest.

Upon the request of the sheriff of the county, the chief of police of the jurisdiction, the district attorney of the judicial circuit, or a local fire official, the state fire marshal and any employees of such official shall have the authority to investigate the cause and origin of any fire which occurred in said county, jurisdiction, or judicial circuit.

Personnel employed and authorized by the state fire marshal shall have the power to make arrests for criminal violations established as a result of investigations. Such personnel must hold certification as a peace officer from the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council and shall have the power to execute arrest warrants and search warrants for criminal violations and to arrest, upon probable cause and without warrant, any person found violating any of the provisions of applicable criminal laws. Authorized personnel empowered to make arrests pursuant to this Code section shall be empowered to carry firearms as authorized by the state fire marshal in the performance of their duties. It shall be unlawful for any person to resist an arrest authorized by this Code section or to interfere in any manner, including abetting or assisting such resistance or interference, with personnel employed by the state fire marshal in the duties imposed upon such personnel by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 509, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 966, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 331, § 1.

Cross references.

Obstructing or hindering law enforcement officers, §

16-10-24

.

25-2-10.
Appeal from rulings of state fire marshal to Commissioner; appeal from Commissioner to superior court; bond.

Should any person, firm, corporation, or public entity be dissatisfied with any ruling or decision of the state fire marshal, the right is granted to appeal within ten days to the Commissioner. If the person, firm, corporation, or public entity is dissatisfied with the decision of the Commissioner, appeal is authorized to the superior court within 30 days in the manner provided under Chapter 13 of Title 50. In the event of such appeal, the person, firm, corporation, or public entity shall give a surety bond which will be conditioned upon compliance with the order and direction of the state fire marshal or the Commissioner or both. The amount of bond shall be fixed by the Commissioner in such amount as will reasonably cover the order issued by the Commissioner or the state fire marshal or both.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 29; Ga. L. 1959, p. 50, § 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 894, § 1.

25-2-11.
[Reserved] Local inspections — Duty of cities and counties generally; assistance of cities and counties by state fire marshal.

History.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 25/HB 79, reserved the designation of this Code section, effective April 24, 2013; repealed by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1779, § 8, effective April 1, 1982.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1779, § 8 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 1, 1982.

25-2-12.
Adoption of state fire safety standards and enforcement; investigations; excuse from compliance with standards; interpretation of standards and granting variances therefrom by Commissioner.

The county governing authority in any county having a population of 100,000 or more, and the municipal governing authority in any municipality having a population of 45,000 or more, each as determined by the most recent decennial census published by the United States Bureau of the Census, and those municipalities pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall adopt the state minimum fire safety standards adopted in the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, including all subsequent revisions thereof.

With respect to those buildings and structures listed in Code Section 25-2-13, except for hospitals, nursing homes, jails, ambulatory health care centers, and penal institutions and except for buildings and structures which are owned and operated or occupied by the state, every such local governing authority shall be responsible for enforcing such fire safety standards within its jurisdiction and shall:

Conduct fire safety inspections of existing buildings and structures;

Review plans and specifications for proposed buildings and structures, issue building permits when plans are approved, and conduct fire safety inspections of such buildings and structures; and

Issue permanent and temporary certificates of occupancy.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed so as to prohibit fire service personnel of any such local governing authority from making inspections of any state owned and operated or occupied building or structure listed in Code Section 25-2-13 and from filing reports of such inspections with the office of the Commissioner.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed so as to place upon any municipality, county, or any officer or employee thereof, the responsibility to take enforcement action regarding any existing building or structure listed in Code Section 25-2-13, if such building or structure was granted a certificate of occupancy pursuant to a waiver granted prior to January 1, 1982, and which was granted pursuant to the recommendation of the engineering staff over the objection of the local authority having jurisdiction.

Every such local governing authority shall have the authority to charge and retain appropriate fees for performing the duties required in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of this subsection. In cases where the governing authority of a municipality enforcing fire safety standards pursuant to this subsection contracts for the enforcement of fire safety standards, any municipal or county office or authority providing such enforcement shall not charge fees in excess of those charged in its own political subdivision for such enforcement.

Every such local governing authority shall be responsible for investigating all cases of arson and other suspected incendiary fires within its jurisdiction, shall have the duties and powers authorized by Code Sections 25-2-27, 25-2-28, and 25-2-29 in carrying out such responsibility, and shall submit quarterly reports to the state fire marshal containing fire-loss data regarding all fires within its jurisdiction. The state fire marshal shall have the authority to initiate any arson investigation upon request of any such local governing authority and he shall provide assistance to the requesting authority regarding any of the duties and responsibilities required by this paragraph.

No such local governing authority shall have the authority to grant any waiver or variance which would excuse any building, structure, or proposed plans for buildings or structures from compliance with the state minimum fire safety standards as adopted in the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

Municipalities having a population of less than 45,000 as determined by the most recent decennial census published by the United States Bureau of the Census may adopt the state minimum fire safety standards adopted in the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, including all subsequent revisions thereof. The municipal governing authority shall indicate its intention to adopt and enforce the state minimum fire safety standards by forwarding a resolution so indicating to the Commissioner. The municipality shall then adopt and enforce the state minimum fire safety standards as set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section.

With respect to those buildings and structures listed in Code Section 25-2-13, in jurisdictions other than those jurisdictions covered under subsection (a) of this Code section, and with respect to every such hospital and every such building and structure owned and operated or occupied by the state, wherever located, the office of the Commissioner shall perform those duties specified in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section and shall perform all other duties required by this chapter.

Except as specifically stated in this Code section, nothing in this Code section shall reduce or avoid the duties and responsibilities of the office of the Commissioner or the state fire marshal imposed by other Code sections of this chapter, other provisions of this Code, or any existing contract or agreement and all renewals thereof between the office of the Commissioner or the state fire marshal and any other state or federal government agency. Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the office of the Commissioner, state fire marshal, or any local governing authority from entering into any future contract or agreement regarding any of the duties imposed under this Code section.

The office of the Commissioner shall be responsible for interpretations of the state minimum fire safety standards as adopted in the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

On the construction on existing buildings, local governments authorized to enforce the state minimum fire safety standards pursuant to subsection (a) and subsection (b) of this Code section, notwithstanding paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of this Code section, may grant variances from compliance with the state minimum fire safety standards as adopted in the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

On the construction on existing buildings not under the jurisdiction of a local government for purposes of paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Commissioner may grant variances from compliance with the state minimum fire safety standards as adopted in the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

On the construction of new buildings, the Commissioner, upon the written recommendation of the state fire marshal and the written request of the fire or building official responsible for enforcing the state minimum fire safety standards, may grant variances from compliance with the state minimum fire safety standards as adopted in the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter in jurisdictions covered under subsection (a) of this Code section and jurisdictions other than those covered under subsection (a) of this Code section.

Variances granted pursuant to paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of this subsection shall be as nearly equivalent as practical to the standards required in this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1779, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 479, §§ 1, 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 721, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2186, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 25/HB 90.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “subsection (a) of this Code section” for “subsection (a) of Code Section 25-2-12” at the end of subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For article, “Local Government Litigation: Some Pivotal Principles,” see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2003).

25-2-12.1.
Deputizing of local fire marshals, deputy local fire marshals, and state inspectors as state officers; qualification of applicants; duty to notify state fire marshal of employment status change; removal.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Deputy local fire marshal” means any person who is employed by, supervised by, or otherwise assists a local fire marshal and who has been or is seeking to be deputized pursuant to this Code section.

“Local fire marshal” means any employee or independent contractor of any municipality, county, or other governing authority not adopting the state minimum fire safety standards as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 25-2-12 who is responsible for performing fire safety duties for such municipality, county, or governing authority and who has been or is seeking to be deputized pursuant to this Code section.

“State inspector” means any person who is employed by any board, commission, or other administrative authority of any state owned and operated or occupied facility, who is responsible for performing fire safety duties within such facility, and who has been or is seeking to be deputized pursuant to this Code section.

Upon application submitted by any governing authority or administrative authority described in subsection (a) of this Code section, the state fire marshal, subject to the approval of the Commissioner and in accordance with this Code section, shall have the authority to deputize local fire marshals, deputy local fire marshals, or state inspectors, as appropriate, as state officers. The application shall be verified by an appropriate official and shall contain the name, address, and current place of employment for each applicant seeking to be deputized and the dates and places of past employment, educational background, training experience, any area of specialization and the basis therefor, and such other information as may be required by the state fire marshal.

Prior to deputizing any local fire marshal, deputy local fire marshal, or state inspector, the state fire marshal shall examine the applicant’s education, training, and employment experience to ascertain whether the applicant is qualified to perform duties in one or more of the following areas:

Fire safety inspections;

Review of plans and specifications; or

Arson investigations.

If the state fire marshal is satisfied that the applicant is qualified, he shall recommend to the Commissioner that the applicant be deputized as a state officer to perform the appropriate duties on behalf of the state.

It shall be the responsibility of the governing authority to notify the state fire marshal when a local fire marshal is no longer employed by or accountable to such governing authority. It shall be the responsibility of the local fire marshal to ensure that his deputy local fire marshals perform their appointed duties and to notify the state fire marshal when a deputy local fire marshal is no longer employed under his authority. It shall be the responsibility of the administrative authority to ensure that state inspectors perform their appointed duties and to notify the state fire marshal when a state inspector is no longer employed by such administrative authority.

All deputized local fire marshals, deputy local fire marshals, and state inspectors shall submit monthly reports of their activities to the state fire marshal and shall comply with the administrative procedures of the state fire marshal’s office. Any deputized local fire marshal, deputy local fire marshal, or state inspector who is found by the state fire marshal to be negligent in performing his appointed duties or in fulfilling his responsibilities shall be removed from his position as a state officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1779, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 25; Ga. L. 1982, p. 479, §§ 2, 5.